Utah statutes.
3-1-16.1.   Resignation of officers.

(1)  An officer may resign by giving written notice of the resignation to the association.

(2)  A resignation of an officer is effective when the notice is received by the association, unless the notice specifies a future effective date.

(3)  If a resignation is to be effective as of a future date, the board of directors may:

(a)  allow the officer to remain in office until that date and fill the pending vacancy before the effective date, providing that the successor does not take office until the effective date; or

(b)  remove the officer prior to the effective date and fill the resulting vacancy.



Enacted by Chapter 204, 1994 General Session

